Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2,137
Nonwaiver.

The right of a servient estate owner to relocate an easement under the Uniform Easement Relocation Act may not be waived, excluded, or restricted by agreement even if:

(1) the instrument creating the easement prohibits relocation or contains a waiver, exclusion, or restriction of the Uniform Easement Relocation Act;

(2) the instrument creating the easement requires consent of the easement holder to amend the terms of the easement; or

(3) the location of the easement is fixed by the instrument creating the easement, another agreement, previous conduct, acquiescence, estoppel, or implication.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 74.